Florida, session 2026, SB1344.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 34 35 Section 1.âSection 501.1739, Florida Statutes, is created 36 to read: 37 501.1739âCompanion artificial intelligence chatbots; system 38 operators regulated.â 39 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 40 (a)ââAnonymous age verificationâ has the same meaning as in 41 s. 501.1738. 42 (b)ââCompanion AI chatbotâ means any software-based 43 artificial intelligence system or program that exists for the 44 primary purpose of simulating interpersonal or emotional 45 interaction, friendship, companionship, or therapeutic 46 communication with a user. 47 (c)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Legal Affairs. 48 (d)ââMinorâ means any individual who is under 18 years of 49 age. 50 (e)ââOperatorâ means any person who owns, operates, or 51 otherwise makes available a companion AI chatbot to individuals 52 in this state. 53 (f)ââPop-upâ means a visible notification on the screen of 54 a user which may be resolved if the user interacts with or 55 responds to the notification. 56 (g)ââSexually explicit communicationâ means any content, 57 conversation, or material that describes, depicts, or encourages 58 sexually explicit conduct, sexual excitement, or sexual 59 activity. 60 (h)ââStandard age verificationâ means any commercially 61 reasonable method of age verification approved by the operator. 62 (2)âAn operator shall require an individual seeking access 63 to a companion AI chatbot to create a user account to use or 64 otherwise interact with the chatbot. 65 (3)âWith respect to companion AI chatbot user accounts in 66 existence before July 1, 2026, an operator shall: 67 (a)âOn such date, freeze or otherwise disable any such 68 account; 69 (b)âRequire the user of the frozen or disabled account to 70 provide age information and verify that information using 71 standard age verification or anonymous age verification before 72 the functionality of such account may be restored; and 73 (c)âUsing standard age verification or anonymous age 74 verification, classify each user as either a minor or an adult. 75 (4)âUpon the creation of a new companion AI chatbot user 76 account, an operator shall: 77 (a)âRequest age information from the user; and 78 (b)âVerify the userâs age using standard age verification 79 or anonymous age verification. 80 (5)âIf the age verification process determines that a user 81 is a minor, an operator must do all of the following: 82 (a)âRequire the account of such user to be affiliated with 83 a parental account that has been verified using standard age 84 verification or anonymous age verification; 85 (b)âObtain verifiable parental consent from the holder of 86 the affiliate parental account before allowing the minor to 87 access and use the companion AI chatbot; and 88 (c)âBlock the minorâs access to any companion AI chatbot 89 that prompts, promotes, solicits, or otherwise suggests sexually 90 explicit communication. 91 (6)âAn operator shall protect the confidentiality of age 92 information provided by a user for age verification in 93 accordance with s. 501.1738. 94 (7)âAt the beginning of any interaction between a user and 95 a companion AI chatbot, and no less frequently than every 60 96 minutes thereafter during such interaction, an operator shall 97 display a pop-up that notifies users that they are not engaging 98 in dialogue with a human counterpart. 99 (8)(a)âA violation of this section is deemed an unfair and 100 deceptive trade practice actionable under part II of this 101 chapter solely by the department on behalf of a user of a 102 companion AI chatbot. If the department has reason to believe 103 that an operator is in violation of this section, the department 104 may, as the enforcing authority, bring an action against the 105 operator for an unfair or deceptive act or practice. For the 106 purpose of bringing an action pursuant to this section, ss. 107 501.211 and 501.212 do not apply. In addition to any other 108 remedy under part II of this chapter, the department may collect 109 a civil penalty of up to $50,000 per violation and reasonable 110 attorney fees and court costs. 111 (b)âA third party that performs age verification for an 112 operator in violation of this section is deemed to have 113 committed an unfair and deceptive trade practice actionable 114 under part II of this chapter by the department solely against 115 such third party. For the purpose of bringing an action pursuant 116 to this section, ss. 501.211 and 501.212 do not apply. 117 (9)âThis section does not preclude any other available 118 remedy at law or equity. 119 (10)âFor purposes of bringing an action pursuant to this 120 section, any entity or person who meets the definition of an 121 operator that owns, operates, or otherwise makes available a 122 companion AI chatbot to individuals in this state is considered 123 both to be engaged in substantial and not isolated activities 124 within this state and to be operating, conducting, engaging in, 125 or carrying on a business, and doing business in this state, and 126 is therefore subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this 127 state. 128 (11)(a)âIf, by its own inquiry or as a result of 129 complaints, the department has reason to believe that an entity 130 or a person has engaged in, or is engaging in, an act or 131 practice that violates this section, the department may 132 administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses or matter, 133 and collect evidence. Within 5 days, excluding weekends and 134 legal holidays, after the service of a subpoena or at any time 135 before the return date specified therein, whichever is longer, 136 the party served may file in the circuit court in the county in 137 which it resides or in which it transacts business and serve 138 upon the enforcing authority a petition for an order modifying 139 or setting aside the subpoena. The petitioner may raise any 140 objection or privilege which would be available upon service of 141 such subpoena in a civil action. The subpoena must inform the 142 party served of its rights under this subsection. 143 (b)âIf the matter that the department seeks to obtain by 144 subpoena is located outside this state, the entity or person 145 subpoenaed may make it available to the department or its 146 representative to examine the matter at the place where the 147 party is located. The department may designate representatives, 148 including officials of the state where the matter is located, to 149 inspect the matter on its behalf and may respond to similar 150 requests from officials of other states. 151 (c)âUpon failure of an entity or a person without lawful 152 excuse to obey a subpoena and upon reasonable notice to all 153 persons affected, the department may apply to the circuit court 154 for an order compelling compliance. 155 (d)âThe department may request that an entity or a person 156 who refuses to comply with a subpoena on the ground that 157 testimony or matter may incriminate the entity or person be 158 ordered by the court to provide the testimony or matter. Except 159 in a prosecution for perjury, an entity or person who complies 160 with a court order to provide testimony or matter after 161 asserting a valid privilege against self-incrimination may not 162 have the testimony or matter so provided, or evidence derived 163 therefrom, received against the entity or person in any criminal 164 investigation or proceeding. 165 (e)âAn entity or a person upon whom a subpoena is served 166 pursuant to this section shall comply with the terms thereof 167 unless otherwise provided by order of the court. Any entity or 168 person who fails to appear with the intent to avoid, evade, or 169 prevent compliance in whole or in part with any investigation 170 under this part or who removes from any place, conceals, 171 withholds, mutilates, alters, or destroys, or by any other means 172 falsifies any documentary material in the possession, custody, 173 or control of any entity or person subject to any such subpoena, 174 or knowingly conceals any relevant information with the intent 175 to avoid, evade, or prevent compliance, is liable for a civil 176 penalty of not more than $5,000 per week in violation, 177 reasonable attorney fees, and costs. 178 (12)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 179 section. 180 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.